test/src/morphology/N-venet_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: linn../bin/olo-gen.hfstol
    Morph: linn../bin/olo.hfstol
  xerox:
    Gen: linn../bin/iolo.fst
    Morph: linn../bin/olo.fst
    App: linnlookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: linnrun analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - venet: # Noun 'borg' - full paradigm
     venet+N+Sg+Nom: venet
     venet+N+Sg+Gen: venheen
     venet+N+Sg+Acc: venettä
     venet+N+Sg+Par: venettä
     venet+N+Sg+Tra: venheeksi
     venet+N+Sg+Abe: venheessä
     venet+N+Sg+Com: venehein
     venet+N+Sg+Ine: venheessä
     venet+N+Sg+Ela: venheestä
     venet+N+Sg+Ill: venheesseen
     venet+N+Sg+Ade: venheelä
     venet+N+Sg+Abl: venheeltä
     venet+N+Sg+All: venheele
     venet+N+Sg+Ess: venheenä
     venet+N+Pl+Nom: venheet
     venet+N+Pl+Gen: venheitten
     venet+N+Pl+Acc: venheitä
     venet+N+Pl+Par: venettä
     venet+N+Pl+Tra: venheiksi
     venet+N+Pl+Abe: venheittä
     venet+N+Pl+Com: venhein
     venet+N+Pl+Ine: venheissä
     venet+N+Pl+Ela: venheistä
     venet+N+Pl+Ill: venheissiin
     venet+N+Pl+Ade: venheilä
     venet+N+Pl+Abl: venheiltä
     venet+N+Pl+All: venheile
     venet+N+Pl+Ess: venheinä
